District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0591.
BE IT ENACTED by the Council of the District of Columbia, that this act may be cited
as the “Lifesaving Intervention Empowering Neighborhoods (LIEN) Act of 2026”.
Sec.2. Lien authority for housing violations.
(a) The Department of Buildings (“Department”) may record a lien against real property
when any of the following apply:
(1) The Department has issued a Notice of Infraction — Emergency and the
owner failed to correct the condition within the time stated, or immediate recordation is
necessary to protect occupants or the public;
(2) The Department has issued a Notice of Infraction designated by rule as
requiring immediate corrective action due to a health or safety risk and the owner failed to
correct within the time stated;

(3) The property has an uncured Class 1 violation; or
(4) There is an unpaid civil penalty arising from a housing violation after a final
order and the owner failed to pay within the demand period established by rule.
(b) The lien amount may include civil penalties assessed by the Department and
administrative costs established by rule that are related to the condition or violation described in
subsection (a). Interest may accrue at a rate established by rule.
(c) Before recordation, the Department shall serve a notice of intent to record a lien on
the owner by first-class mail and one additional method reasonably calculated to provide notice,
which may include certified mail, electronic mail where the owner has consented, or posting at
the property. The notice shall identify the property, the basis for lien under subsection (a), and
the amount to be recorded. Where immediate action is necessary to protect life or safety, the
Department may record a lien and serve the notice within 24 hours after recordation.
(d) An owner may petition the Office of Administrative Hearings within the time
established by rule to contest identity, arithmetic accuracy of the amount, whether the condition
qualifying under subsection (a)(1) through (3) has been corrected, or whether a penalty
referenced in subsection (a)(4) has been paid. The merits of any underlying violation may not be
re-litigated. Recordation is not stayed by the filing of a petition.
(e) A lien recorded under this section shall be released by the Department within 2
business days after verification of correction of the condition, payment of the recorded amount,
enrollment in and compliance with a Department payment plan for assessed penalties, or entry of
an order vacating the lien.
(f) A lien recorded under this section attaches to the real property upon recordation and
has the same force, effect, and priority as a real property tax lien.

(g) Nothing in this section limits any other remedy available to the District, including
referral to the Central Collection Unit or abatement under other law.
Sec. 3. Special assessments for District abatement.
(a) If the Department of Buildings (“Department”) performs abatement after an owner
fails to correct a violation within the time required by notice or order, the Department may
certify documented abatement costs to the Office of Tax and Revenue as a special assessment
against the property.
(b) A special assessment certified under this section shall be billed and collected in the
same manner and at the same time as real property taxes and shall constitute a lien on the
property with the same priority as a real property tax lien.
(c) The Department shall provide written notice to the owner of the certified amount with
an itemized statement of costs. Review is limited to identity, arithmetic accuracy, and whether
the Department has documented abatement at the subject property. The Office of Administrative
Hearings has jurisdiction as provided in section 6 of the Office of Administrative Hearings
Establishment Act of 2001, effective March 6, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-76; D.C. Official Code § 2-
1831.03).
(d) Amounts collected under this section shall be deposited into an abatement fund
established by law and made available to the Department for future abatements.
Sec. 4. Conforming amendments.
(a) Section 6 of the Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Act of 2001,
effective March 6, 2002 (D.C. Law 14-76; D.C. Official Code § 2-1831.03). is amended by
adding a new subsection (b-32) to read as follows:

“(b-32) This act shall apply to petitions filed under sections 2 and 3 of the Lifesaving
Intervention Empowering Neighborhoods (LIEN) Act of 2026, introduced on January 23, 2026
(Bill 26-XXX) ; provided, that jurisdiction is limited to the issues specified in those sections.”.
(b) Chapter 31 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding a new section 47-3411 to read as follows:
“Sec. 47-3411. Authority to collect liens and special assessments.
The Office of Tax and Revenue shall be authorized to record, bill, collect, and release
liens and special assessments certified by the Department of Buildings (“Department”) under
sections 2 and 3 of the Lifesaving Intervention Empowering Neighborhoods (LIEN) Act of 2026,
introduced on January 23, 2026 (Bill 26-XXX), and to exchange data with the Department and
the Central Collection Unit for that purpose.”.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement for this legislation.
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor, a 30-day period of
Congressional review, and publication in the District of Columbia Register.